en: Hare loin
fr: Longe de lièvre

en: Frozen hare loin
fr: Longe de lièvre surgelée

en: Frozen hare
fr: Lièvre surgelé

en: Wild boars
de: Wildschwein
fr: Sangliers
hr: Divlje svinje

en: Wild boar shoulder
fr: Epaule de sanglier

en: Frozen wild boar shoulder
fr: Epaule de sanglier surgelée

en: Wild boar leg
fr: Cuissot de sanglier

en: Frozen wild boar leg
fr: Cuissot de sanglier surgelé

en: Wild boar loin
fr: Longe de sanglier

en: Frozen wild boar loin
fr: Longe de sanglier surgelée

en: Venison, Roebuck
de: Rehfleisch
fr: Chevreuil
hr: Divljač

en: Venison shoulder
fr: Epaule de chevreuil

en: Frozen Venison shoulder
fr: Epaule de chevreuil surgelée

en: Venison haunch
fr: Cuissot de chevreuil

en: Frozen Venison haunch
fr: Cuissot de chevreuil surgelée

en: Venison loin
fr: Longe de chevreuil

en: Frozen Venison loin
fr: Longe de chevreuil surgelé

en: Hart
de: Hirsch
fr: Cerf
hr: Srce

en: Hart shoulder, deer shoulder
fr: Epaule de cerf

en: Frozen hart shoulder, Frozen deer shoulder
fr: Epaule de cerf surgelée